Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1093.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4581(a)(2)(i) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:SECTION 1. SECTION 4581(A)(2)(I) AND (B) OF TITLE 75 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES ARE AMENDED TO READ:§ 4581. Restraint systems.(a) Occupant protection.--* * *(2) (i) The driver of a passenger car, Class I truck, Class II truck or motor home operated in this Commonwealth shall have the following duties:(A) [if] If under 18 years of age, be secured in a properly adjusted and fastened safety seat belt <--<--1234567891011121314151617 system[; and].(B) [secure] Secure or cause to be secured in a properly adjusted and fastened safety seat belt every vehicle occupant eight years of age or older but under 18 years of age.* * *(B) OFFENSE.--(1) ANYONE WHO FAILS TO COMPLY WITH THE PROVISIONS OF SUBSECTION (A)(1) OR (1.1) COMMITS A SUMMARY OFFENSE AND SHALL, UPON CONVICTION, BE SENTENCED TO PAY A FINE OF $75. THE COURT IMPOSING AND COLLECTING ANY SUCH FINES SHALL TRANSFER THE FINES THUS COLLECTED TO THE STATE TREASURER FOR DEPOSIT IN THE CHILD PASSENGER RESTRAINT FUND, PURSUANT TO SECTION 4582 (RELATING TO CHILD PASSENGER RESTRAINT FUND).(2) ANYONE WHO VIOLATES SUBSECTION (A)(2) OR (3) COMMITS A SUMMARY OFFENSE AND SHALL, UPON CONVICTION, BE SENTENCED TO PAY A FINE OF $10. NO PERSON SHALL BE CONVICTED OF A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (A)(2)(II) UNLESS THE PERSON IS ALSO CONVICTED OF ANOTHER VIOLATION OF THIS TITLE WHICH OCCURRED AT THE SAME TIME. NO COSTS AS DESCRIBED IN 42 PA.C.S. § 1725.1 (RELATING TO COSTS) SHALL BE IMPOSED FOR SUMMARY CONVICTION OF SUBSECTION (A)(2) OR (3).(3) ANYONE WHO VIOLATES SUBSECTION (A)(2)(I)(B) AND IS UNDER 18 YEARS OF AGE MAY NOT BE CHARGED WITH MORE THAN ONE VIOLATION, REGARDLESS OF THE NUMBER OF UNSECURED VEHICLE OCCUPANTS EIGHT YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER BUT UNDER 18 YEARS OF AGE, COMMITTED AT THE SAME TIME AND PLACE.(4) CONVICTION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL NOT CONSTITUTE A MOVING VIOLATION.* * *20250HB1093PN2090 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1093PN2090 - 3 - 1